Utah statutes.
58-69-306.   Exemptions from licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307:
(1)  a person performing mechanical work on inert matter in a laboratory
pursuant to a written prescription from a licensed dentist may engage in acts
and practices included in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene without
being licensed under this chapter; and
(2)  a person licensed in good standing as a dentist in another state, with no
licensing action pending and no less than ten years of professional
experience, may engage in the practice of dentistry without being licensed
under this chapter if:
(a)  the services are rendered as a public service and for a noncommercial
purpose;
(b)  no fee or other consideration of value is charged, received, expected, or
contemplated for the services rendered beyond an amount necessary to cover the
proportionate cost of malpractice insurance; and
(c)  the individual does not otherwise engage in unlawful or unprofessional
conduct.
